Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.475

Timber harvest excise tax agreements.

(1) The governor may enter into timber harvest excise tax agreements concerning the harvest of timber. All timber harvest excise tax agreements must meet the requirements for timber harvest excise tax agreements under this section. The terms of a timber harvest excise tax agreement are not effective unless the agreement is authorized in RCW 43.06.480.

(2) Timber harvest excise tax agreements shall be in regard to timber harvests on fee land within the exterior boundaries of the reservation of the Indian tribe and are not in regard to timber harvests on trust land or land owned by the tribe within the exterior boundaries of the reservation.

(3) The agreement must provide that the tribal tax shall be credited against the state and county taxes imposed under RCW 84.33.041 and 84.33.051.

(4) Tribal ordinances for timber harvest excise taxation, or other authorizing tribal laws, which implement the timber harvest excise tax agreement with the state, must incorporate or contain provisions identical to chapter 84.33 RCW that relate to the tax rates and measures, such as stumpage values.

(5) Timber harvest excise tax agreements must be for renewable periods of no more than eight years.

(6) Timber harvest excise tax agreements must include provisions for compliance, such as inspection procedures, recordkeeping, and audit requirements.

(7) Tax revenue retained by the tribe must be used for essential government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of timber harvesters is prohibited.

(8) The timber harvest excise tax agreement may include provisions to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.

(9) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate the timber harvest excise tax agreements to the department of revenue.

(10) Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of a timber harvest excise tax agreement is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.330. The department of revenue may enter into an information sharing agreement with the tribe to facilitate sharing information to improve tax collection.

(11) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include dispute resolution procedures, contract termination procedures, and provisions delineating the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe and the department of revenue.

(12) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include provisions to require taxpayers to submit information that may be required by the department of revenue or tribe.

(13) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Essential government services" means services such as forestland management; protection, enhancement, regulation, and stewardship of forested land; land consolidation; tribal administration; public facilities; fire; police; public health; education; job services; sewer; water; environmental and land use; transportation; utility services; and public facilities serving economic development purposes as those terms are defined in *RCW 82.14.370(3)(c);

(b) "Forestland" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035;

(c) "Harvester" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035;

(d) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington; and

(e) "Timber" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035.

[ 2007 c 69 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 82.14.370 was amended by 2024 c 58 s 1, changing subsection (3)(c) to subsection (4).

Findings—Intent—2007 c 69: "The legislature finds that in certain areas of taxation, where both a tribe and the state have jurisdiction and where there are challenges to administering a tax, tax agreements between the state and a tribe are a sound approach to resolving issues and simplifying processes. The legislature specifically recognizes that in the area of the timber excise tax, within the boundaries of the Quinault Reservation, the state faces challenges due to access to land and access to taxpayers. The activity being taxed takes place entirely within the reservation and is regulated by the tribe and by the state. The legislature therefore finds that shifting from a state administered tax, to a tribal tax credited against the state tax, will bring benefits such as consistent taxation, improved forest practices and water quality, improved fisheries, and sustainability. The legislature intends to further the government-to-government relationship between the state of Washington and the Quinault Nation by authorizing the governor to enter into an agreement related to timber harvest excise taxes." [ 2007 c 69 s 1.]